New York, session 2025-2026, A7452.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 342-aaa 2 to read as follows: 3 § 342-aaa. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to 4 Boston NY Fallen Firefighters. The bridge on Rice Hill Road, in the 5 town of Boston, county of Erie, crossing over state route two hundred 6 nineteen, shall be dedicated to Boston NY Fallen Firefighters. 7 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 8 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 9 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 10 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Boston NY Fallen Firefighters". 11 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 12 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 13 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge 14 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02510-09-5